Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-310
Contact lenses or spectacles; prescription; contents; release to patient.

No person in this state may dispense contact lenses or spectacles, other than over-the-counter spectacles, to a patient without a valid prescription from a provider. A valid prescription for spectacles or contact lenses (1) shall contain an expiration date of not less than two years for spectacles or one year for contact lenses from the date of the eye examination by the provider or a statement by the provider of the reasons why a shorter time is appropriate based on the medical needs of the patient and (2) may not be made based solely on information about the human eye generated by a kiosk. The prescription shall take into consideration any medical findings and any refractive error discovered during the eye examination. A provider may not refuse to release a prescription for spectacles or contact lenses to a patient.

Laws 2016, LB235, § 3.